Hawaii statutes.
§190-5 Penalty. (a) Any person
violating this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant thereto, or the terms and
conditions of any permit issued under section 190-4, shall be guilty of a petty
misdemeanor and punished as provided in subsections (b) and (c).

(b) The punishment, in addition to any other
penalties, shall be a fine of not less than:

(1) $250 for a first offense;

(2) $500 for a second offense; and

(3) $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense.

(c) The court may require the defendant to
complete an aquatic resources educational class administered by the department
of land and natural resources in addition to or in lieu of paying all or any
part of any monetary fine authorized by this section.

(d) The court may allow the defendant to
perform community service as administered by the department of land and natural
resources in lieu of paying any monetary fine authorized by this section. [L
1955, c 192, §8; RL 1955, §21-137; HRS §190-5; am L 1981, c 16, §4; am L 1999,
c 195, §9; am L 2016, 67, §3]

Cross References

General administrative penalties, see §187A-12.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next